Indiana, session 2026, SB227.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-22 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 22. COUNTER-UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM
AUTHORITY
Chapter 1. Applicability
Sec. 1. This article applies:
(1) if a federal law is enacted that authorizes state or local law
enforcement personnel to detect, track, identify, or mitigate
an unmanned aircraft system under federal approval,
certification, or oversight; and
(2) after the governor publishes a notice in the Indiana
Register that includes a description of this section and
identifies the federal statute or program that provides the
authorization described in subdivision (1).
Chapter 2. Definitions
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this article:
(1) "Counter-UAS system" means an unmanned aircraft
detection or mitigation system approved under federal law
and listed on the federal C-UAS Technology List jointly
maintained by the:
(A) United States Department of Justice;
SEA 227

2
(B) United States Department of Homeland Security;
(C) United States Department of War;
(D) United States Department of Transportation;
(E) Federal Communications Commission; and
(F) National Telecommunications and Information
Administration.
(2) "High-risk site" includes a large scale public event, a
federally rated special event assessment rating event, critical
infrastructure, a correctional facility, an airport, or any other
location designated by the state police department consistent
with federal requirements.
(3) "Mitigation" means an action authorized by federal law to
disrupt, disable, seize control of, or otherwise neutralize an
unmanned aircraft system.
(4) "Participating agency" means a law enforcement agency
designated under this article to perform counter-UAS
functions in accordance with federal authorization.
(5) "Trained personnel" means individuals who have
completed training and certification at the national
counter-UAS schoolhouse maintained by the United States
Department of Justice and the United States Department of
Homeland Security, as required under federal law.
(6) "Unmanned aircraft system" or "UAS" has the meaning
set forth in 49 U.S.C. 44801.
Chapter 3. Statewide Coordination
Sec. 1. The state police department is the statewide coordinating
agency for counter-UAS activities authorized under federal law.
Sec. 2. Subject to IC 10-22-1, the state police department shall:
(1) apply to the appropriate federal agencies for authorization
to acquire, deploy, operate, and train with counter-UAS
systems;
(2) enter into agreements required by federal law or federal
policy;
(3) ensure all acquired systems are on the federal C-UAS
Technology List;
(4) administer a statewide program governing operational
procedures, reporting, training, and compliance;
(5) oversee federal audits and compliance reviews; and
(6) maintain records of counter-UAS activities required by
federal agencies.
Sec. 3. The state police department may adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 to implement this article.
SEA 227

3
Chapter 4. Participating Agencies and Pilot Project Location
Sec. 1. The state police department may designate a law
enforcement agency of a political subdivision as a participating
agency if the agency satisfies federal requirements for personnel
training and operational readiness.
Sec. 2. The state police department may designate the city of
Indianapolis as a pilot project location due to the concentration of
high-risk sites and special event assessment rating events. A
location with a pilot project designation must comply with federal
requirements.
Chapter 5. Authorized Activities
Sec. 1. Trained personnel within the scope of federal
authorization may perform detection, identification, tracking,
warning, disruption, control seizure, confiscation, or disabling of
an unmanned aircraft system only to the extent authorized by
federal law and subject to federal approval.
Sec. 2. Mitigation activities may not be performed under this
article unless expressly authorized under federal law.
Chapter 6. Reporting, Deconfliction, and Revocation
Sec. 1. The state police department shall participate in any
federal drone reporting or deconfliction system applicable to state
or local law enforcement agencies.
Sec. 2. A participating agency shall submit to the state police
department a post-event report within the time required under
federal law for notification to federal agencies.
Sec. 3. The superintendent of the state police department shall
suspend or revoke participation if required by federal audit, if a
participating agency fails to comply with federal or state
procedures or if federal authorization is withdrawn.
Chapter 7. Procurement and Funding
Sec. 1. The state police department and participating agencies
may receive federal grants for acquiring counter-UAS systems
listed on the federal approved list, for training at the national
counter-UAS schoolhouse, and for administrative costs.
Sec. 2. A counter-UAS system may not be purchased or
deployed unless the system appears on the federal C-UAS
Technology List.
Chapter 8. Liability
Sec. 1. Activities performed under this article by trained
personnel within the scope of federal authorization are actions
within the scope of employment for purposes of IC 34-13-3.
Chapter 9. Construction
SEA 227

4
Sec. 1. This article shall be interpreted to conform to federal
law. If a conflict exists between this article and a federal
requirement applicable to counter-UAS activities, the federal
requirement controls.
SECTION 2. IC 34-30-2.1-127.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 127.5. IC 10-22-8-1 (Concerning
certain counter-unmanned aircraft system activities).
SEA 227

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 227